New York, session 2025-2026, A11186.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 138-a of the cannabis law, as 2 amended by section 14 of part G of chapter 55 of the laws of 2024, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 2. upon receiving information that establishes probable cause of 5 unlawful conduct pursuant to this section, conduct reasonable searches 6 and seize any cannabis, cannabis product, cannabinoid hemp or hemp 7 extract product, or any product marketed or labeled as such, found in 8 the possession of a person engaged in the conduct described in subdivi- 9 sion one of this section and their place of business, including a vehi- 10 cle used for such business, if such searches are conducted in a reason- 11 able manner, administrative in nature, designed to detect administrative 12 violations in furtherance of the regulatory scheme established pursuant 13 to this chapter, and designed to guarantee certainty and regularity of 14 application; 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15567-01-6